Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-101.02
Oath of office; false statement; penalty.

If any false statement is made in taking either of the oaths prescribed in sections 11-101 and 11-101.01, the person making such false statement shall be deemed guilty of a Class IV felony. No person convicted of perjury in taking the oath as prescribed in either section 11-101 or 11-101.01, shall hold any nonelective position, job, or office for the State of Nebraska, or any political subdivision thereof, where the remuneration of such position, job, or office is paid in whole or in part by public money or funds of the State of Nebraska, or of any political subdivision thereof.

Laws 1951, c. 206, § 3, p. 767;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 71.